Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAO CULTURE DANCE FASHION MN.new text end new text begin $160,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Lao Culture Dance and Traditional Fashion Show LLC to foster traditional Lao dance and fashion arts education and public cultural programming for Minnesota youth and families. new text end